apertium-pes.pes.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>
<alphabet>شابپتثچجحَخِديذةرزژسشصضطظعغقکگلىمنهیئونكفهؤپءٔأآاً</alphabet>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser" c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux" c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past" c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="neg" c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="px1sg" c="Possessive, First person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg" c="Possessive, Second person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg" c="Possessive, Third person singular"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl" c="Possessive, First person plural"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl" c="Possessive, Second person plural"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl" c="Possessive, Third person plural"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn" c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pst" c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="al" c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pp" c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="pii" c="Pretério imperfecto de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acc" c="Accusative"/>

    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>


    <sdef n="sent" c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/>

    <sdef n="pref" c="Prefix"/>

    <sdef n="izo" c="izofa"/>
    <sdef n="me" c="me verb prefix"/>
    <sdef n="bi" c="bi verb prefix"/>
    <sdef n="cont" c="continuous verb prefix"/>
    <sdef n="pprf" c="present perfect verb"/>
    
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>

    

    <pardef n="numeros">

      
                              <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="coma">

                              <e>       <p><l>،</l><r>،<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="separa">

                              <e><re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="S__poss">

                              <e>       <p><l>م</l><r><j/>ام<s n="enc"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ت</l><r><j/>ات<s n="enc"/><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ش</l><r><j/>اش<s n="enc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>مان</l><r><j/>امان<s n="enc"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>تان</l><r><j/>اتان<s n="enc"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>شان</l><r><j/>اشان<s n="enc"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>مون</l><r><j/>امان<s n="enc"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>تون</l><r><j/>اتان<s n="enc"/><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>شون</l><r><j/>اشان<s n="enc"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
    <pardef n="S__pos__cons">

                              <e>       <p><l>م</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ت</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ش</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>مان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>تان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>شان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowel">

                              <e>       <p><l>ام</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>اش</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>مان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>تان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>شان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowels">

                              <e>       <p><l>ام</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>اش</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>یمان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>یتان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>یشان</l><r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="S__ی">

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>

  
    <pardef n="S__یی">

                              <e>       <p><l>یی</l><r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>

    
    <pardef n="S__ای">

                              <e>       <p><l>‌ای</l><r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ای</l><r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>

  
    <pardef n="S__ه">

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><j/>ی<s n="enc"/><s n="izo"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>

 

                            <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
                            <e><par n="separa"/></e>
                            <e><par n="coma"/></e>
